Washington statutes.
RCW 18.51.240

Alterations or additions—Preliminary inspection and approval.

The department may prescribe by regulations that any licensee or applicant desiring to make specific types of alterations or additions to its facilities or to construct new facilities shall, before commencing such alteration, addition or new construction, submit its plans and specifications therefor to the department for preliminary inspection and approval or recommendations with respect to compliance with the regulations and standards herein authorized.

[ 1981 1st ex.s. c 2 s 23; 1975 1st ex.s. c 99 s 11.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates—1981 1st ex.s. c 2: See notes following RCW 18.51.010.